dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- राम्रो; राम्र; 5 -->
    <pardef n="राम्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-राम्रा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ैराम्रा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रशस्त; प्रशस्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रशस्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेर्सो; तेर्सो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेर्सो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संजमो; संजमो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संजमो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुनौलो; सुनौल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सुनौल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टुहुरो; टुहुर; 3 -->
    <pardef n="टुहुर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विजयाशालिनी; विजयाशालिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विजयाशालिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नमिठो; नमिठो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नमिठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आर्थिक; आर्थिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आर्थिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघिल्लो; अघिल्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अघिल्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोरो; गोर; 3 -->
    <pardef n="गोर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मैलो; मैल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="मैल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लफङ्गा; लफङ्गा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लफङ्गा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राजनैतिक; राजनैतिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राजनैतिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वढी; वढी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वढी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रकाशन; प्रकाश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रकाश/न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r>न<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुख्य; मुख्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुख्य__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एउटै; एउटै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एउटै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संयुक्त; संयुक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संयुक्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तीखो; तीखो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तीखो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्तिम; अन्तिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्तिम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साहित्य; साहित्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साहित्य__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िक</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फरक; फरक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फरक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महंगो; महंगो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महंगो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विष; विष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विष__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>म</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सच्चा; सच्चा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सच्चा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लङ्गडा; लङ्गडा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लङ्गडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अमिलो; अमिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अमिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाक्लो; वाक्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाक्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हरियो; हरिय; 2 -->
    <pardef n="हरिय/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्यारो; प्यार; 3 -->
    <pardef n="प्यार/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रातो; रात; 3 -->
    <pardef n="रात/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-राता</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निश्चित; निश्चित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निश्चित__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महत्वपूर्ण; महत्वपूर्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महत्वपूर्ण__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संवैधानिक; संवैधानिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संवैधानिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="राम्रो"><i>राम्र</i><par n="राम्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रशस्त"><i>प्रशस्त</i><par n="प्रशस्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तेर्सो"><i>तेर्सो</i><par n="तेर्सो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संजमो"><i>संजमो</i><par n="संजमो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुनौलो"><i>सुनौल</i><par n="सुनौल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="टुहुरो"><i>टुहुर</i><par n="टुहुर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विजयाशालिनी"><i>विजयाशालिनी</i><par n="विजयाशालिनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नमिठो"><i>नमिठो</i><par n="नमिठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आर्थिक"><i>आर्थिक</i><par n="आर्थिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अघिल्लो"><i>अघिल्ल</i><par n="अघिल्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गोरो"><i>गोर</i><par n="गोर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मैलो"><i>मैल</i><par n="मैल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लफङ्गा"><i>लफङ्गा</i><par n="लफङ्गा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="राजनैतिक"><i>राजनैतिक</i><par n="राजनैतिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वढी"><i>वढी</i><par n="वढी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकाशन"><i>प्रकाश</i><par n="प्रकाश/न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुख्य"><i>मुख्य</i><par n="मुख्य__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एउटै"><i>एउटै</i><par n="एउटै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संयुक्त"><i>संयुक्त</i><par n="संयुक्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तीखो"><i>तीखो</i><par n="तीखो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्तिम"><i>अन्तिम</i><par n="अन्तिम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साहित्य"><i>साहित्य</i><par n="साहित्य__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फरक"><i>फरक</i><par n="फरक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="महंगो"><i>महंगो</i><par n="महंगो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विष"><i>विष</i><par n="विष__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सच्चा"><i>सच्चा</i><par n="सच्चा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लङ्गडा"><i>लङ्गडा</i><par n="लङ्गडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमिलो"><i>अमिलो</i><par n="अमिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्लो"><i>वाक्लो</i><par n="वाक्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हरियो"><i>हरिय</i><par n="हरिय/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्यारो"><i>प्यार</i><par n="प्यार/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रातो"><i>रात</i><par n="रात/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निश्चित"><i>निश्चित</i><par n="निश्चित__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="महत्वपूर्ण"><i>महत्वपूर्ण</i><par n="महत्वपूर्ण__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संवैधानिक"><i>संवैधानिक</i><par n="संवैधानिक__adj"/></e>
